Hawaii statutes.
§261-14 Federal-state joint hearings,
reciprocal services, accident reporting. (a) Joint hearings. The
department of transportation may confer with or hold joint hearings with any
agency of the United States in connection with any matter arising under this
chapter, or relating to the sound development of aeronautics.

(b) Reciprocal services. The department may
avail itself of the cooperation, services, records, and facilities of the
agencies of the United States as fully as may be practicable in the
administration and enforcement of this chapter. The department shall furnish
to the agencies of the United States, its cooperation, services, records, and
facilities, insofar as may be practicable.

(c) Accident reporting. The department shall
report to the appropriate agency of the United States all accidents in
aeronautics in the State of which it is informed, and shall insofar as
practicable preserve, protect, and prevent the removal of the component parts
of any aircraft involved in an accident being investigated by it until the
federal agency institutes an investigation. [L 1947, c 32, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§15-20; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §26; HRS §261-14]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next